California statutes. Labor Code
The Labor Commissioner may establish and maintain a Farm Labor Contractor Special Enforcement Unit within the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement office in Fresno of the Department of Industrial Relations for the hiring of additional agents to enforce the provisions of this chapter by revoking, suspending, or refusing to renew farm labor contractors’ licenses pursuant to Section 1690.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 917, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1683.

(a) A person shall not act as a farm labor contractor until a license to do so has been issued to the person by the Labor Commissioner and the license is in full force and effect and in the person’s possession. The Labor Commissioner shall provide by regulation a means of issuing duplicate licenses in case of loss of the original license or any other appropriate instances.

(b) (1) A person who violates this section is subject to a civil penalty as follows:

(A) For any initial citation, one hundred dollars ($100) for each farmworker employed by the unlicensed person, plus
 one hundred dollars ($100) for each calendar day that a violation occurs, for a total penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(B) For a second citation, two hundred dollars ($200) for each farmworker employed by the unlicensed person, plus two hundred dollars ($200) for each calendar day that a violation occurs, for a total penalty not to exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).

(C) For a third or subsequent citation, five hundred dollars ($500) for each farmworker employed by the unlicensed person, plus five hundred dollars ($500) for each calendar day that a violation occurs, for a total penalty not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(2) If, upon inspection or investigation, the Labor Commissioner
 determines that a person has violated this section, the Labor Commissioner shall issue a citation. The procedures for issuing, contesting, and enforcing citations or civil penalties issued by the Labor Commissioner for a violation of this section are the same as those described in Section 1197.1.

(3) The civil penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Farmworker Remedial Account and shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for purposes of this chapter.

(4) The civil penalties provided for in this section are in addition to any other penalty provided by law.

(c) For purposes of this section, “license”
 includes a letter of authorization issued by the Labor Commissioner pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1695.7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 857, Sec. 1.   (AB 1675)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1684.

(a) The Labor Commissioner shall not issue to any person a license to act as a farm labor contractor, nor shall the Labor Commissioner renew that license, until all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The person has executed a written application in a form prescribed by the Labor Commissioner, subscribed and sworn to by the person, and containing all of the following:

(A) A statement by the person of all facts required by the Labor Commissioner concerning the applicant’s character, competency, and responsibility, and the manner and method by which the person proposes to conduct operations as a farm labor contractor if the license is issued.

(B) The names and addresses of all persons, except bona fide employees on stated salaries, financially interested, either as partners, associates, or profit sharers, in the proposed operation as a farm labor contractor, together with the amount of their respective interests.

(C) A declaration consenting to the designation by a court of the Labor Commissioner as an agent available to accept service of summons in any action against the licensee if the licensee has left the jurisdiction in which the action is commenced or otherwise has become unavailable to accept service.

(D) The names and addresses of all persons who in the previous calendar year performed any services described in subdivision (b) of Section 1682 within the scope of
 their employment by the licensee on whose behalf they were acting, unless the person was employed as an independent contractor.

(2) The Labor Commissioner, after investigation, is satisfied as to the character, competency, and responsibility of the person.

(3) (A) The person has deposited with the Labor Commissioner a surety bond in an amount based on the size of the person’s annual payroll for all employees, as follows:

(i) For payrolls up to five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), a twenty-five-thousand-dollar ($25,000) bond.

(ii) For payrolls of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to two million dollars ($2,000,000), a fifty-thousand-dollar ($50,000) bond.

(iii) For payrolls greater than two million dollars ($2,000,000), a seventy-five-thousand-dollar ($75,000) bond.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, the Labor Commissioner shall require documentation of the size of the person’s annual payroll, which may include, but is not limited to, information provided by the person to the Employment Development Department, the Franchise Tax Board, the Division of Workers’ Compensation, the insurer providing the licensee’s workers’ compensation insurance, or the Internal Revenue Service.

(C) If the contractor has been the subject of a final judgment in a year in an amount equal to or
 greater than the amount of the bond required, they shall be required to deposit an additional bond within 60 days.

(D) All bonds required under this chapter shall be payable to the people of the State of California and shall be conditioned upon the farm labor contractor’s compliance with all the terms and provisions of this chapter and subdivisions (j) and (k) of Section 12940 of, and Sections 12950 and 12950.1 of, the Government Code, and payment of all damages occasioned to any person by failure to do so, or by any violation of this chapter or of subdivision (j) or (k) of Section 12940 of, or of Section 12950 or 12950.1 of, the Government Code, or any violation of Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (Public Law 88-352), or false
 statements or misrepresentations made in the procurement of the license. The bond shall also be payable for interest on wages and for any damages arising from violation of orders of the Industrial Welfare Commission, and for any other monetary relief awarded to an agricultural worker as a result of a violation of this code or of subdivision (j) or (k) of Section 12940 of, or Section 12950 or 12950.1 of, the Government Code, or any violation of Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (Public Law 88-352).

(4) The person has paid to the Labor Commissioner a license fee of five hundred dollars ($500) plus a filing fee of ten dollars ($10). However, when a timely application for renewal is filed, the ten-dollar ($10) filing fee is not required. The license fee shall increase by one hundred dollars ($100), to six hundred dollars ($600), on January 1, 2015. The amount attributable to this increase shall be expended by the Labor Commissioner to fund
 the Farm Labor Contractor Enforcement Unit and the Farm Labor Contractor License Verification Unit. The Labor Commissioner shall deposit one hundred fifty dollars ($150) of each licensee’s annual license fee into the Farmworker Remedial Account. Funds from this account shall be disbursed by the Labor Commissioner only to persons determined by the Labor Commissioner to have been damaged by any licensee or to persons determined by the Labor Commissioner to have been damaged by an unlicensed farm labor contractor.

(A) In making these determinations, the Labor Commissioner shall disburse funds from the Farmworker Remedial Account to satisfy claims against farm labor contractors or unlicensed farm labor contractors, which shall include unpaid wages, interest on wages, and any damages or other monetary relief arising from the violation of orders of the Industrial Welfare Commission or from a violation of this code, including statutory penalties
 recoverable by an employee determined to be due to an agricultural worker and for all damages arising from any violation of subdivision (j) or (k) of Section 12940 of, or of Section 12950 or 12950.1 of, the Government Code, or any violation of Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (Public Law 88-352).

(B) A disbursement shall be made pursuant to a claim for recovery from the account in accordance with procedures prescribed by the Labor Commissioner.

(C) Disbursed funds subsequently recovered from a liable party by the Labor Commissioner pursuant to Section 1693, or otherwise, shall be returned to the Farmworker Remedial Account.

(5) The person has taken a written examination that demonstrates an essential degree of knowledge of the current laws and administrative regulations concerning farm labor contractors as
 the Labor Commissioner deems necessary for the safety and protection of farmers, farmworkers, and the public, including the identification and prevention of sexual harassment in the workplace. To successfully complete the examinations, the person must correctly answer at least 85 percent of the questions posed. The examination period shall not exceed four hours. The examination may only be taken a maximum of three times in a calendar year. The examinations shall include a demonstration of knowledge of the current laws and regulations regarding wages, hours, and working conditions, penalties, employee housing and transportation, collective bargaining, field sanitation, and safe work practices related to pesticide use, including all of the following subjects:

(A) Field reentry regulations.

(B) Worker pesticide safety training.

(C) Employer responsibility for safe working conditions.

(D) Symptoms and appropriate treatment of pesticide poisoning.

(6) The person has registered as a farm labor contractor pursuant to the federal Migrant and Seasonal Agricultural Worker Protection Act (29 U.S.C. Sec. 1801 et seq.), when registration is required pursuant to federal law, and that information is provided by the person to the Labor Commissioner.

(7) Each of the person’s employees has registered as a farm labor contractor employee pursuant to the federal Migrant and Seasonal Agricultural Worker Protection Act (29 U.S.C. Sec. 1801 et seq.) if that registration is required pursuant to federal law, and that information is provided by the person to the Labor Commissioner.

(8) (A) The person has executed a written statement, that has been provided to the Labor Commissioner, attesting that the person’s supervisorial employees, including any supervisor, crewleader, mayordomo, foreperson, or other employee whose duties include the supervision, direction, or control of agricultural employees, have been trained at least once for at least two hours each calendar year in the prevention of sexual harassment in the workplace, and that all new nonsupervisorial employees, including agricultural employees, have been trained at the time of hire, and that all nonsupervisorial employees, including agricultural employees, have been trained at least once every two years in identifying, preventing, and reporting sexual harassment in the workplace.

(B) Sexual harassment prevention training shall consist of training administered by a licensee or appropriate designee of the licensee. Sexual
 harassment training for each agricultural employee shall be in the language understood by that employee. The person may comply with this language requirement either by providing the training in that language or by having the training interpreted for the employee in the language that they understand.

(C) Sexual harassment prevention training shall include, at a minimum, components of the following as consistent with Section 12950 of the Government Code:

(i) The illegality of sexual harassment.

(ii) The definition of sexual harassment under applicable state and federal law.

(iii) A description of sexual harassment, utilizing examples.

(iv) The internal complaint process of the employer available to the employee.

(v) The legal remedies and complaint process available through the Civil Rights Department.

(vi) Directions for how to contact the
 Civil Rights Department.

(vii) The protection against retaliation provided under current law.

(D) (i) The trainer may use the text of the Civil Rights Department’s pamphlet CRD-185, “Sexual Harassment” as a guide to training, or may use other written material or other training resources covering the information required in subparagraph (C).

(ii) As part of
 their application for license renewal, in order to establish that training is occurring, a licensee shall provide the Labor Commissioner with a complete list of all materials or resources utilized to provide sexual harassment prevention training to their agricultural employees in the calendar year before the month the renewal application is submitted.

(E) At the conclusion of the training, the trainer shall provide the employee with a copy of the
 Civil Rights Department’s pamphlet
 CRD-185, and a record of the training on a form provided by the Labor Commissioner that includes the name of the trainer and the date of the training.

(F) The licensee shall keep a record with the names of all employees who have received sexual harassment training for a period of three years.

(G) (i) As part of their application for license renewal, the licensee shall provide to the Labor Commissioner the total number of agricultural employees trained in sexual harassment prevention in the calendar year before the month the renewal application is submitted.

(ii) The Labor Commissioner shall annually aggregate the data provided under this subparagraph by licensees and publish on the internet website of the Labor Commissioner the total number of agricultural employees trained in sexual harassment prevention in the previous calendar year.

(b) The Labor Commissioner shall consult with the Director of Pesticide Regulation, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, the Department of Housing and Community Development, the Employment Development Department, the
 Civil Rights Department, the Department of Food and Agriculture, the Department of Motor Vehicles, and the Division of Occupational Safety and Health in preparing the examination required by paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) and the appropriate educational materials pertaining to the matters included in the examination, and may charge a fee of not more than two hundred dollars ($200) to cover the cost of administration of the examination.

(c) The person shall also enroll and participate in at least nine hours of relevant educational classes each year. The classes shall include at least one hour of sexual harassment prevention training. The classes shall be chosen from a list of approved classes prepared by the Labor Commissioner, in consultation with the persons and entities listed in subdivision (b) and county agricultural commissioners.

(d) The Labor Commissioner may renew a license without requiring the applicant for renewal to take the examination specified in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) if the Labor Commissioner finds that the applicant meets all of the following criteria:

(1) Has satisfactorily completed the examination during the immediately preceding two years.

(2) Has not during the preceding year been found to be in violation of any applicable laws or regulations including, but not limited to, Division 7 (commencing with Section 12500) of the Food and Agricultural Code, subdivisions (j) and (k) of Section 12940 of, and Section 12950 or 12950.1 of, the Government Code, Part 1 (commencing with Section 17000) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code, Division 2 (commencing with Section 200), Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200), and Division 5 (commencing with Section 6300) of this
 code, and Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 12500) of Division 6 of the Vehicle Code.

(3) Has, for each year since the license was obtained, enrolled and participated in at least eight hours of relevant, educational classes, chosen from a list of approved classes prepared by the Labor Commissioner.

(4) Has complied with all other requirements of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 48, Sec. 64.   (SB 189)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1684.3.

Whenever an application for a license or renewal is made, and application processing pursuant to this chapter has not been completed, the Labor Commissioner may, at his or her discretion, issue a temporary or provisional license valid for a period not exceeding 90 days, and subject, where appropriate, to the automatic and summary revocation by the Labor Commissioner. Otherwise, the conditions for issuance or renewal shall meet the requirements of Section 1684.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 557, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1684.5.

The Labor Commissioner shall quarterly submit to the Department of the California Highway Patrol a list of all licensees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 917, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1685.

No license to operate as a farm labor contractor shall be granted:

(a) To any person who sells or proposes to sell intoxicating liquors in a building or on premises where he or she operates or proposes to operate as a farm labor contractor.

(b) To a person whose license has been revoked within three years from the date of application.

(c) To a person who, within the preceding three years, has been found by a court or an administrative agency to have committed sexual harassment of an employee, or who, within the preceding three years, employed any supervisor, crewleader,
 mayordomo, foreperson, or any other employee of the applicant whose duties include the supervision, direction, or control of any agricultural worker whom the applicant knew or should have known has been found by a court or an administrative agency, within the preceding three years of his or her employment with the applicant, to have committed sexual harassment of an employee. A person shall be deemed not to have knowledge under this subdivision that any supervisor, crewleader, mayordomo, foreperson, or any other employee has been found by a court or any administrative agency to have committed sexual harassment if that supervisor, crewleader, mayordomo, foreperson, or any other employee executes a statement on a form provided by the Labor Commissioner that includes the following statement: “I have not been found to have committed sexual harassment by any court or any administrative agency within the preceding three years.” This subdivision shall not apply until the Labor Commissioner prepares the form and
 makes it available on the division’s Internet Web site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 750, Sec. 2.   (SB 1087)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1686.

The Labor Commissioner, upon proper notice and hearing, may refuse to grant a license. The proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and the commissioner shall have all of the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1746.)
-------------------------------------------

1687.

(a) Each laminated license shall contain, on the face thereof, all of the following:

(1) The name and address of the licensee and the fact that the licensee is licensed to act as a farm labor contractor for the period upon the face of the license only.

(2) The number, date of issuance, and date of expiration of the license.

(3) The amount of the surety bond deposited by the licensee.

(4) The fact that the license may not be transferred or assigned.

(5) A picture of the licensee taken at the time of application.

(b) The license shall be similar in size and format to a driver’s license issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles, and shall contain a hologram and a signature to verify authenticity. The cost of the hologrammed license shall be appropriated from the license fee.

(c) The license shall contain on the back thereof the definition of a farm labor contractor, as defined by subdivision (b) of Section 1682.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 917, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1688.

The license when first issued shall run to the next birthday of the applicant, and each license shall then be renewed within the 30 days preceding the licensee’s birthday and shall run from birthday to birthday. In case the applicant is a partnership or corporation, the license for a partnership shall be renewed within the 30 days preceding the birthday of the oldest partner, and the license for a corporation shall be renewed within the 30 days preceding the anniversary of the date the corporation was lawfully formed. Renewal shall require the filing of an application for renewal, a renewal bond, and the payment of the annual license fee, but the Labor Commissioner may demand that a new application or a new bond be submitted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 301.)
-------------------------------------------

1689.

All applications for renewal shall state the names and addresses of all persons, except bona fide employees on stated salaries, financially interested either as partners, associates or profit sharers in the operation of the farm labor contractor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 125.)
-------------------------------------------

1690.

The Labor Commissioner may revoke, suspend, or refuse to renew any license if it is shown that any of the following have occurred:

(a) The licensee or any agent of the licensee has violated or failed to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter.

(b) The licensee has made any misrepresentations or false statements in his or her application for a license.

(c) The conditions under which the license was issued have changed or no longer exist.

(d) The licensee, or any agent of the licensee, has violated, or has
 willfully aided or abetted any person in the violation of, or failed to comply with, any law of the State of California regulating the employment of employees in agriculture, the payment of wages to farm employees, or the conditions, terms, or places of employment affecting the health and safety of farm employees, which is applicable to the business, activities, or operations of the licensee in his or her capacity as a farm labor contractor.

(e) The licensee, or any agent of the licensee, has failed to comply with any provisions of the Vehicle Code pertaining to a farm labor vehicle, as described in Section 322 of the Vehicle Code, under the licensee’s control, or has allowed a farm labor vehicle under his or her control to be operated by a driver without a valid driver’s license and certificate required pursuant to Section 12519 of the Vehicle Code.

(f) The licensee has been
 found, by a court or the Secretary of Labor, to have violated any provision of the federal Migrant and Seasonal Agricultural Worker Protection Act (29 U.S.C. Sec. 1801 et seq.), provided that the licensee is required to register as a farm labor contractor pursuant to federal law.

(g) The licensee has been found by a court or an administrative agency to have committed sexual harassment of an employee, or has employed any supervisor, crewleader, mayordomo, foreperson, or any other employee of the licensee whose duties include the supervision, direction, or control of any agricultural worker on behalf of the licensee, whom the licensee knew or should have known has been found by a court or an administrative agency, within the preceding three years, to have committed sexual harassment of an employee. A licensee shall be deemed not to have knowledge under this subdivision that any supervisor, crewleader, mayordomo, foreperson, or any other employee
 has been found by a court or any other administrative agency to have committed sexual harassment if that supervisor, crewleader, mayordomo, foreperson, or any other employee executes a statement on a form provided by the Labor Commissioner that includes the following statement: “I have not been found to have committed sexual harassment by any court or any administrative agency within the preceding three years.” This subdivision shall not apply until the Labor Commissioner prepares the form and makes it available on the division’s Internet Web site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 750, Sec. 3.   (SB 1087)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1690.1.

(a) (1) If a licensee fails to remit the proper amount of worker contributions required by Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 901) of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, or the Employment Development Department has made an assessment for unpaid worker contributions against the licensee that is final, the Labor Commissioner shall, upon written notice by the Employment Development Department, refuse to issue or renew the license of that licensee until the licensee has fully paid the amount of delinquency for the unpaid worker contributions.

(2) The Labor Commissioner shall not, however, refuse to renew the license of a licensee under this
 section until the assessment for unpaid worker contributions is final and unpaid, and the licensee has exhausted, or failed to seek, his or her right of administrative review of that final assessment, pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 901) of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(b) If any licensee fails to remit the amounts required by Section 227, the Labor Commissioner shall refuse to issue or renew the license of the licensee until the delinquent amount has been paid in full.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 750, Sec. 4.   (SB 1087)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1691.

(a) If any licensee has been subject to two or more final judgments by a court for failure to pay wages due with respect to his or her agricultural employees within a five-year period, the Labor Commissioner shall suspend for one year the license of the licensee. The Labor Commissioner shall maintain a telephone information line for the purpose of advising potential or actual employees of farm labor contractors regarding the compliance of individual farm labor contractors with applicable laws and regulations.

(b) For purposes of this section, a “serious violation” shall have the same meaning as provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 6130 of Title 3 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1349, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1692.

Before revoking or suspending any license, the Labor Commissioner shall afford the holder of such license an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel. The proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the commissioner shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1746.)
-------------------------------------------

1692.5.

A licensee whose license is suspended or revoked pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall immediately surrender such license to the Labor Commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 448.)
-------------------------------------------

1693.

The Labor Commissioner and the deputies and representatives authorized by the Labor Commissioner in writing may take assignments of actions on the bond against licensees by persons damaged and may prosecute such actions on behalf of persons who, in the judgment of the Labor Commissioner, are financially unable to employ counsel, in the same manner that claims are prosecuted under Section 98.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 304.)
-------------------------------------------

1694.

If a licensee has departed from the state or has left the jurisdiction in which a violation of this chapter is alleged to have occurred with intent to defraud creditors or to avoid service of summons in any action brought under this chapter, service shall be made upon the surety as prescribed in the Code of Civil Procedure. A copy of the summons shall be mailed to the licensee at the last known post office address of his or her residence, as shown by the records of the Labor Commissioner. Service is complete as to the licensee, after mailing, at the expiration of the time prescribed by the Code of Civil Procedure for service of summons in the particular court in which suit is brought.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 750, Sec. 5.   (SB 1087)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1695.

(a) Every licensee shall do all of the following:

(1) Carry his or her license and proof of registration issued pursuant to paragraph (8) with him or her at all times and exhibit the same to all persons with whom he or she intends to deal in his or her capacity as a farm labor contractor prior to so dealing.

(2) File at the United States Post Office serving the address of the licensee, as noted on the face of his or her license, with the office of the Labor Commissioner, and with the agricultural commissioner of the county or counties in which the labor contractor has contracted with a grower, a correct change of address immediately upon each occasion the
 licensee permanently moves his or her address. The address shall also be the mailing address for purposes of notice required by the Labor Code or by any other applicable statute or regulations respecting service by mail.

(3) Promptly when due, pay or distribute to the individuals entitled thereto, all moneys or other things of value entrusted to the licensee by any third person for this purpose.

(4) Comply on his or her part with the terms and provisions of all legal and valid agreements and contracts entered into between the licensee in his or her capacity as a farm labor contractor and third persons.

(5) Have available for inspection by his or her employees and by the grower with whom he or she has contracted a written statement in English and Spanish showing the rate of compensation he or she receives from the
 grower and the rate of compensation he or she is paying to his or her employees for services rendered to, for, or under the control of the grower. Upon written request, the statement shall be provided to a current or former employee or the grower within 21 calendar days. A licensee who fails to comply with this paragraph is subject to a civil penalty of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) recoverable by the employee or the grower.

(6) Take out a policy of insurance with any insurance carrier authorized to do business in the State of California in an amount satisfactory to the commissioner, which insures the licensee against liability for damage to persons or property arising out of the licensee’s operation of, or ownership of, any vehicle or vehicles for the transportation of individuals in connection with his or her business, activities, or operations as a farm labor contractor.

(7) Have displayed prominently at the site where the work is to be performed and on all vehicles used by the licensee or his or her employees or agents for the transportation of employees the rate of compensation the licensee is paying to his or her employees for their services, printed in both English and Spanish and in lettering of a size to be prescribed by the Department of Industrial Relations.

(8) Register annually with the agricultural commissioner of the county or counties in which the labor contractor has contracted with a grower.

(9) Provide information and training on applicable laws and regulations governing worker safety, including the requirements of Article 10.5 (commencing with Section 12980) of Chapter 2 of Division 7 of the Food and Agricultural Code, sexual harassment, or regulating the terms and conditions of agricultural employment, to each
 crewleader, foreperson, or other employee whose duties include the supervision, direction, or control of any agricultural worker on behalf of a licensee, or pursuant to, a contract or agreement for agricultural services entered into with a licensee.

(b) The board of supervisors of a county may establish fees to be charged each licensee for the recovery of the actual costs incurred by commissioners in the administration of registrations and change of address and the issuance of proofs of registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 750, Sec. 6.   (SB 1087)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1695.5.

(a) Every farm labor contractor, upon request of any agricultural grower with whom he or she has a contract to supply farmworkers, shall immediately furnish the grower with a payroll list of all the contractor’s employees working for the grower.

(b) The payroll list shall be on a uniform form approved by the Labor Commissioner, which shall include, but not be limited to, the employee’s name, social security number, permanent and temporary address, telephone number, and length of employment with the grower.

(c) The requirements of this section are in addition to any requirements of federal law, including the federal Migrant and Seasonal Agricultural Worker Protection Act (Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 1801), Title 29, United States Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1000, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1695.55.

(a) Every person acting in the capacity of a farm labor contractor shall provide any grower with whom he or she has contracted to supply farmworkers a payroll record for each farmworker providing labor under the contract. The payroll record shall include a disclosure of the net and gross wages, total hours worked, and total hourly and piece rate earnings for each farmworker.

(b) Each grower entering into a contract with a farm labor contractor shall retain a copy of the payroll record provided by the contractor for a period of three years after the contract has ended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 750, Sec. 7.   (SB 1087)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1695.6.

No person shall knowingly enter into an agreement for the services of a farm labor contractor who is not licensed under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 803.)
-------------------------------------------

1695.7.

(a) (1) Prior to entering into any contract or agreement to supply agricultural labor or services to a grower, a farm labor contractor shall first provide to the grower a copy of his or her current valid state license. A failure to do so is a violation of this chapter. The grower shall keep a copy of the license for a period of three years following the termination of the contract or agreement.

(2) In the event that the licensee or prospective licensee has fulfilled all the requirements for a license, but the Labor Commissioner has not been able to timely issue or renew a license, the Labor Commissioner shall issue to the person applying for a license, or renewal of a license, a letter of authorization permitting that person to operate or continue to operate as a farm labor contractor. For purposes of this section, a “valid state license” shall include a letter of authorization issued pursuant to this paragraph.

(3) (A) No grower shall enter into a contract or agreement with a person acting in the capacity of a farm labor contractor who fails to provide a copy of his or her license. A grower has an affirmative obligation to inspect the license of any person contracted as a farm labor contractor, a copy of whose license is provided to the grower pursuant to paragraph (1), and to verify that the license is valid. The grower shall request verification from the license verification unit by the close of the third business day following the day on which the farm labor contractor is engaged. The grower may be supplied services by the farm labor contractor and shall not be liable under this section for an invalid license while awaiting verification from the verification unit. The verification received from the license verification unit shall serve as conclusive evidence of the grower’s compliance with this subparagraph. The verification shall be valid until the farm labor contractor’s license expires. Failure to comply with this subparagraph is a violation of this chapter.

(B) A farm labor contractor has an affirmative obligation to inspect the license of any person contracted by the farm labor contractor who is acting in the capacity of a farm labor contractor a copy of whose license is provided to the farm labor contractor pursuant to Section 1695.9, and to verify that the license is valid. The farm labor contractor shall request verification from the license verification unit by the close of the third business day following the day on which the individual who is acting as the farm labor contractor is engaged. The farm labor contractor may be supplied services by the acting farm labor contractor and shall not be liable under this section for an invalid license while awaiting verification from the verification unit. The verification received from the license verification unit shall serve as conclusive evidence of the farm labor contractor’s compliance with this subparagraph. The verification shall be valid until the individual’s license expires. Failure to comply with this subparagraph is a violation of this chapter.

(C) If a determination is made by the Labor Commissioner that the verification system is inoperable, no grower or farm labor contractor shall be liable under this section until seven business days after the Labor Commissioner determines the system is operable and has made public notice to affected parties.

(4) (A) If a contract or agreement entered into with a farm labor contractor extends beyond the expiration date of his or her license, or extends beyond the date contained in the letter of authorization to operate, the farm labor contractor shall provide to the grower, upon renewal of the license or issuance of the letter of authorization a copy of his or her current valid renewed license or a copy of a letter of authorization issued by the Labor Commissioner. In the event the farm labor contractor’s license is not renewed, the farm labor contractor shall notify the grower within three days.

(B) If a contract or agreement entered into by a farm labor contractor with another farm labor contractor extends beyond the expiration date of his or her license, or extends beyond the date contained in the letter of authorization to operate, the other farm labor contractor shall provide to the farm labor contractor, upon renewal of the license or issuance of the letter of authorization a copy of his or her current valid renewed license or a copy of a letter of authorization issued by the Labor Commissioner. In the event the license of a person contracted by a farm labor contractor who is acting as farm labor contractor is not renewed, the person shall notify the farm labor contractor within three days.
